Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7493.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 3-6-1 of the General Laws in Chapter 3-6 entitled "Manufacturing
and Wholesale Licenses" is hereby amended to read as follows:
3-6-1. Manufacturer’s license.
(a) A manufacturer’s license authorizes the holder to establish and operate a brewery,
distillery, or winery at the place described in the license for the manufacture of beverages within
this state. The license does not authorize more than one of the activities of operator of a brewery or
distillery or winery and a separate license shall be required for each plant.
(b) The license also authorizes the sale at wholesale, at the licensed place by the
manufacturer of the product of the licensed plant, to another license holder and the transportation
and delivery from the place of sale to a licensed place or to a common carrier for that delivery. The
license does authorize the sale of beverages for consumption on premises where sold; provided that
the manufacturer does not sell an amount in excess of forty-eight ounces (48 oz.) of malt beverage
or four and one-half ounces (4.5 oz.) of distilled spirits, or fifteen ounces (15 oz.) of wine per
visitor, per day, or a combination not greater than three (3) drinks where a drink is defined as up to
sixteen ounces (16 oz.) of beer or one and one-half ounces (1.5 oz.) or five ounces (5 oz.) of wine
of spirits, for consumption on the premises. The license also authorizes the sale of beverages
produced on the premises in an amount not in excess of forty-eight (48) twelve-ounce (12 oz.)
bottles or cans or forty-eight (48) sixteen-ounce (16 oz.) bottles or cans of malt beverages, or an

amount not in excess of seven hundred sixty-eight fluids ounces (768 fl. oz.) in any vessel or one
thousand five hundred milliliters (1,500 ml) of distilled spirits per visitor, or three (3) seven hundred
fifty milliliter (750 ml) bottles of wine or the equivalent amount of wine sold by the can or other
container, per day, to be sold in containers that may hold no more than seventy-two ounces (72 oz.)
each. These beverages may be sold to the consumers for off-premises consumption, and shall be
sold pursuant to the laws governing retail Class A establishments. The containers for the sale of
beverages for off-premises consumption shall be sealed. The license does not authorize the sale of
beverages in this state for delivery outside this state in violation of the law of the place of delivery.
The license holder may provide to visitors, in conjunction with a tour or tasting, samples, clearly
marked as samples, not to exceed three hundred seventy-five milliliters (375 ml) per visitor for
distilled spirits and seventy-two ounces (72 oz.) per visitor for malt beverages at the licensed plant
by the manufacturer of the product of the licensed plant to visitors for off-premises consumption.
The license does not authorize providing samples to a visitor of any alcoholic beverages for off-
premises consumption that are not manufactured at the licensed plant. All manufacturer licenses
conducting retail sales or providing samples shall be subject to compliance with alcohol server
training and liquor liability insurance requirements set forth in §§ 3-7-6.1 and 3-7-29 and the
regulations promulgated thereunder.
(c) The annual fee for the license is three thousand dollars ($3,000) for a distillery
producing more than fifty thousand gallons (50,000 gal.) per year and five hundred dollars ($500)
for a distillery producing less than or equal to fifty thousand gallons (50,000 gal.) per year; five
hundred dollars ($500) for a brewery; and one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) for a winery
producing more than fifty thousand gallons (50,000 gal.) per year and five hundred dollars ($500)
per year for a winery producing less than fifty thousand gallons (50,000 gal.) per year. All those
fees are prorated to the year ending December 1 in every calendar year and shall be paid to the
general treasurer for the use of the state.
(d) Notwithstanding § 3-7-18 and any other provision of the law to the contrary, a holder
of a manufacturer’s license for a brewery, whether located within or outside this state, if authorized
by the department of business regulation, may sell, transport, deliver, and distribute malt beverages
of its own manufacture directly to retailers licensed under this title within this state without using
a licensed Rhode Island wholesaler, subject to the following requirements:
(1) If, in any calendar year, a brewery manufacturer:
(i) Self-distributes five thousand (5,000) barrels or more within the state; or
(ii) Has a total annual production of eight thousand (8,000) barrels or more, then the
brewery manufacturer shall, within thirty (30) days after meeting the applicable threshold either
LC004764 - Page 2 of 4

enter into a written agreement for distribution within this state with a wholesaler licensed in Rhode
Island pursuant to this title or cease further self-distribution within this state for the remainder of
that calendar year, except that the brewery manufacturer may complete delivery of orders invoiced
prior to the date the threshold was met, for a period not to exceed fifteen (15) days. Any written
agreement pursuant to this subsection shall be consistent with chapter 3 of title 3, negotiated in
good faith and may include terms governing the grant, purchase, transfer, or other conveyance of
the brewery manufacturer’s Rhode Island distribution rights for one or more brands of malt
beverages.
(2) A brewery manufacturer exercising self-distribution pursuant to the provisions of
subsection (d)(1) of this section shall register with the department prior to commencing self-
distribution in a manner prescribed by the department and maintain complete and accurate books
and records of all self-distributed sales into this state, including invoices and delivery records, for
not less than three (3) years and enter into, maintain, and abide by the terms of a labor peace
agreement as defined in § 21-28.11-12.2.
(e) Subject to city or town approval for a liquor license, a holder of a manufacturer’s license
for a brewery is authorized to have one additional location for the retail sale of alcoholic liquor
manufactured in the state to be consumed on and off the premises pursuant to the provisions of this
chapter.
(f) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, a holder of a manufacturer’s
license issued pursuant to this section may purchase from a duly licensed Rhode Island wholesaler,
for resale at retail for consumption on the premises only, alcoholic beverages that are manufactured
in this state by a manufacturer licensed under this title; provided that, any alcoholic beverages
purchased for resale pursuant to this subsection shall be invoiced by, and delivered from, a Rhode
Island wholesaler licensed under this title and alcoholic beverages resold pursuant to this subsection
shall be limited to malt beverages, wine, and distilled spirits that are manufactured in Rhode Island.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC004764
========
LC004764 - Page 3 of 4